District of Columbia statutes.
21-151

Decree of sale; costs.

When, in a proceeding brought pursuant to section 21-148 , the court is satisfied from the evidence that the interests of the infant require a sale or exchange, as prayed, and the rights of others will not be violated thereby, the sale or exchange may be decreed, and the costs of the suit shall be paid out of the infant’s estate; otherwise they shall be paid by the complainant.

Sept. 14, 1965, 79 Stat. 743, Pub. L. 89-183, § 1
1973 Ed., § 21-151.
1981 Ed., § 21-151.
This section is referenced in § 21-152 and § 21-153.